Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 3.1. Toxics Discharge Reduction.

§ 62.1-44.17:2.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Toxicity”
means the inherent potential or capacity of a material to cause adverse effects on a living organism, including acute or chronic effects on aquatic life, detrimental effects on human health or other adverse environmental effects.

“Toxics”
or

“toxic substance”

means any agent or material listed by the USEPA Administrator pursuant to § 307(a) of the Clean Water Act and those substances on the “toxics of concern” list of the Chesapeake Bay Program as of January 1, 1997.

History.

1997, c. 155; 2000, cc. 17, 1043.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 17 and 1043 are identical, and rewrote the second paragraph.

Law Review.

For an article reviewing key environmental developments at the federal and state levels during the period from June 1996 to June 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1217 (1998).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A M.J. Health and Sanitation, § 1.

§ 62.1-44.17:3.
Toxic substances reduction in state waters; report required.

The Board shall (i) conduct ongoing assessments of the amounts of toxics in Virginia’s waters and (ii) develop and implement a plan for the reduction of toxics in Virginia’s waters.

The status of the Board’s efforts to reduce the level of toxic substances in state waters shall be reported biennially, no later than January 1 in each odd-numbered year, to the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources. The report shall include the following information:

Compliance data on permits that have limits for toxics;

The number of new permits or reissued permits that have toxic limits and the location of each permitted facility;

The location and number of monitoring stations and the period of time that monitoring has occurred at each location;

A summary of pollution prevention and pollution control activities for the reduction of toxics in state waters;

The sampling results from the monitoring stations for the previous two years;

The Board’s plan for continued reduction of the discharge of toxics, which shall include, but not be limited to, additional monitoring activities, a work plan for the pollution prevention program, and any pilot projects established for the use of innovative technologies to reduce the discharge of toxics;

The identification of any segments for which the Board or the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality has made a decision to conduct additional evaluation or monitoring. Information regarding these segments shall include, at a minimum, the geographic location of the stream segment within a named county or city; and

The identification of any segments that are designated as toxic impaired waters as defined in §

62.1-44.19:4

and any plans to address the impairment.

History.

1997, c. 155; 2000, cc. 17, 1043; 2015, c. 173.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 17 and 1043 are identical, and substituted “limits for toxics” for “toxics limits” in subdivision B 1, deleted “and” at the end of subdivision B 5, and added subdivisions B 7 and B 8.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 173 rewrote the introductory paragraph of subsection B, which read “The status of the Board’s efforts to reduce the level of toxic substances in state waters shall be reported, annually no later than January 1, to the House Committees on Conservation and Natural Resources and Chesapeake and Its Tributaries, and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources. The initial report shall be submitted no later than January 1, 1998, and shall include data from the previous five years on the trends of the reduction and monitoring of toxics in state waters. The initial report and each subsequent annual report shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:”; and substituted “two years” for “year” in subdivision B 5.

Law Review.

For an article reviewing key environmental developments at the federal and state levels during the period from June 1996 to June 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1217 (1998).

§ 62.1-44.17:4.
Evaluation of toxics removal and remediation technology.

The Board shall conduct a review of instream toxics removal or remediation technologies, a minimum of once every five years, to determine whether (i) new technologies for responding to toxic contamination will necessitate any changes in the selection of removal or remediation strategies previously included as provisions of Board agreements and (ii) any of the Department of Environmental Quality’s current strategies for responding to toxic contamination need to be revised.

History.

2000, cc. 17, 1043.